Louisiana, session 2026, HB535.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:46.12(E) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§46.12. Hospital-based paternity program
* * *
E. A voluntary acknowledgment executed in accordance with this Section
shall be signed by both parents and the parents' signatures shall be authenticated by
a person possessing notarial powers in accordance with state laws and does not
otherwise require the presence or signature of two witnesses. Any acknowledgment
of paternity obtained through a hospital-based paternity program pursuant to the
process set forth in this Section has the same force and effect as an authentic act for
purposes of changing or recording the paternity of the child with the state registrar
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 535 ENROLLED
of vital records. The provisions of this Subsection do not apply to parents under the
age of eighteen who must establish paternity as otherwise provided by law.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.